District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.10

Vacancy on board.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, if a vacancy occurs on the board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors, the vacancy may be filled by a majority of the directors remaining in office even if they constitute less than a quorum.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a vacancy in the position of a director who is:

(1)

Elected by a voting group of members, by a chapter or other organizational unit of members, or by a region or other geographic grouping of members, shall be filled during the first 3 months after the vacancy occurs only by that voting group or chapter, unit, region, or grouping;

(2)

Appointed by persons other than the members, may be filled only by those persons; or

(3)

Designated in the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall not be filled by action of the board of directors.

(c)

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later time, by reason of a resignation effective at a later time under § 29-406.07(b) or otherwise, may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director shall not take office until the vacancy occurs.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720